Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.130

Accepting appointment as an agent.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, a person accepts appointment as an agent under a power of attorney by exercising authority or performing duties as an agent or by any other assertion or conduct indicating acceptance.

[ 2016 c 209 s 113.]